Tennessee, session 114, SB1084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Dismantling DEI Departments
Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 1, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A department, agency, or other unit of state government shall not maintain or
authorize an office or department that promotes or requires discriminatory preferences in
an effort to increase diversity, equity, or inclusion. All mandates, policies, programs,
activities, guidance, regulations, enforcement actions, consent orders, or other
declarations by such office or department are void.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 5, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A county government shall not maintain or authorize an office or department that
promotes or requires discriminatory preferences in an effort to increase diversity, equity,
or inclusion. All mandates, policies, programs, activities, guidance, regulations,
enforcement actions, consent orders, or other declarations by such office or department
are void.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 6, Chapter 54, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
SB1084
002908
- 1 -

A municipal government shall not maintain or authorize an office or department
that promotes or requires discriminatory preferences in an effort to increase diversity,
equity, or inclusion. All mandates, policies, programs, activities, guidance, regulations,
enforcement actions, consent orders, or other declarations by such office or department
are void.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A metropolitan government shall not maintain or authorize an office or
department that promotes or requires discriminatory preferences in an effort to increase
diversity, equity, or inclusion. All mandates, policies, programs, activities, guidance,
regulations, enforcement actions, consent orders, or other declarations by such office or
department are void.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 7, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A public institution of higher education in this state shall not maintain or authorize
an office or department that promotes or requires discriminatory preferences in an effort
to increase diversity, equity, or inclusion. All mandates, policies, programs, activities,
guidance, regulations, enforcement actions, consent orders, or other declarations by
such office or department are void.
SECTION 7. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002908